District of Columbia statutes.
50-1632

Licensing; violations; identification numbers.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, no commercial bicycle operator shall operate within the District of Columbia without a license issued by the Mayor. A commercial bicycle operator shall pass a bicycle safety test developed by the Mayor in order to receive a commercial bicycle operator’s license.

(b)

It shall be a violation of this subchapter for a commercial bicycle operator licensed under this section to:

(1)

Fail to pay a license fee not to exceed $50 per year;

(2)

Fail to carry a valid commercial bicycle operator’s permit that shall include a photo identification listing the commercial bicycle operator’s name, address, permit number, and any other information required by the Mayor pursuant to subsection (d)(3) of this section;

(3)

Fail to display, in a manner visible from the rear, a valid commercial bicycle operator identification number issued by the Mayor pursuant to subsection (d)(2) of this section and, if employed by, compensated by, utilized by, or under contract to a courier company, the name and telephone number of the courier company, or if not employed by, compensated by, utilized by, or under contract to a courier company, the commercial bicycle operator’s telephone number and address;

(4)

Use a commercial bicycle operator’s permit or identification number assigned to someone other than the commercial bicycle operator; or

(5)

Violate any other requirement created by rule related to commercial bicycle operators.

(c)

After notice and an opportunity to be heard, the commercial bicycle license shall not be renewed or shall be suspended or revoked upon the accumulation of a substantial number of bicycle traffic law violations and unpaid fines as determined by rules promulgated by the Mayor.

(d)

The Mayor shall:

(1)

Issue a commercial bicycle operator’s permit to each commercial bicycle operator who has passed the required bicycle safety test and paid the license fee required under § 50-1632(b)(1);

(2)

Issue commercial bicycle operator identification numbers upon request to courier companies and to commercial bicycle operators not employed by, compensated by, utilized by, or under contract to a courier company;

(3)

Issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, within 120 days of March 29, 1988; and

(4)

Develop a public education program to inform the public of the requirements of this subchapter.

(e)

Commercial bicycle operators operating in the District of Columbia as of March 29, 1988 shall obtain a license from the Mayor within 180 days of March 29, 1988.

History

Mar. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-97, § 3, 35 DCR 1045

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-1631 and § 50-1634.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1412.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-97, “Commercial Bicycle Operators Licensing Act of 1987.”, see Mayor’s Order 88-174, July 29, 1988.